Florida, session 2026, SB494.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSection 1003.211, Florida Statutes, is created 18 to read: 19 1003.211âSchool elopement plans.â 20 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 21 (a)ââDisabilityâ means, for a student in kindergarten 22 through grade 12, an autism spectrum disorder, as defined in the 23 Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth 24 Edition, published by the American Psychiatric Association, or 25 an intellectual disability as defined in s. 393.063. 26 (b)1.ââElopementâ means when a student with autism spectrum 27 disorder or other disability leaves a safe or designated area, 28 the supervision of school staff, or school grounds without 29 authorization or awareness of potential risk, and such student 30 has a documented history of doing so. 31 2.âElopement may include wandering, walking away, running 32 away, or otherwise departing an assigned location unsupervised 33 or unnoticed, only when the behavior is connected to the 34 studentâs disability-related needs and poses a safety concern. 35 3.âElopement does not include intentional class-skipping or 36 other non-disability-related absences. 37 (2)âTo ensure the safety of students with disabilities at 38 risk of elopement, each public school shall create a School 39 Staff Assistance for Emergencies (SAFE) Team and a school 40 elopement plan. The plan must include procedures for immediately 41 contacting the parent or guardian of a student with disabilities 42 if the student elopes. The plan must include procedures for 43 conducting an immediate, coordinated on-campus search and 44 contacting emergency services only when the student is 45 reasonably believed, based on verified information or direct 46 observation, to have left school grounds and to be at risk of 47 harm. 48 (3)âThe school principal and an assistant principal shall 49 serve on the SAFE Team, and the school principal shall appoint 50 at least three other school members, including the school 51 resource officer, to serve on the team. The SAFE Team shall do 52 all of the following: 53 (a)âCreate and annually update the school elopement plan 54 and respond to all elopements. 55 (b)âProvide training to all school personnel to familiarize 56 such personnel with the school elopement plan and all necessary 57 procedures. 58 (4)(a)âIf a student with disabilities is prone to 59 elopement, the SAFE Team, in coordination with the studentâs 60 parent or guardian, must create a student-specific elopement 61 quick reference guide. The elopement quick reference guide must 62 include all of the following: 63 1.âThe studentâs identifying information. 64 2.âA current photograph of the student. 65 3.âThe studentâs level of communication. 66 4.âA list of the studentâs interests, behaviors, 67 preferences, and aversions. 68 5.âAny health considerations for the student. 69 6.âA list of any GPS technology that could be used to help 70 locate the student. 71 7.âA list of possible locations where the student may go 72 when eloping. 73 (b)âThe SAFE Team must distribute a studentâs elopement 74 quick reference guide to the studentâs parent and all relevant 75 school personnel. 76 (5)âEach public school must annually provide its elopement 77 plan to the district school board. 78 (6)âThe state board may adopt rules to administer this 79 section. 80 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.